California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) Commercial operation in itself does not necessarily disqualify a landmark’s registration. However, should a commercial enterprise by its physical development plans, or its proximity, impact, excessive use, or management philosophy so dilute or erode the significance of or quality of the landmark’s integrity, then an adverse effect shall have occurred and its registration may be withdrawn.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1442.)
-------------------------------------------

5033.

The department shall adopt all rules and regulations relating to standards for qualifying as a historical property. In adopting such rules and regulations, the department shall consider all recommendations of the State Historical Resources Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1156.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.4. El Pueblo de Los Angeles State Historic Park [5038. - 5038.3.]

5038.

(a) It is hereby declared to be the policy of the State of California to establish and preserve, as a unique historical and cultural resource for the people of the state, the Mexican and early California cultural and interpretive traditions and heritage of El Pueblo de Los Angeles, as well as to promote the restoration and preservation of the landmarks and buildings of the El Pueblo de Los Angeles State Historic Park. This policy is to be guided by the general plan for the park and implemented in accordance with the historical structures reports on the park approved by the state.

(b) The Legislature recognizes that the existing concessionaires of Olvera Street have made historically significant contributions and that they represent a unique human and cultural resource as stipulated in the park’s general plan. Therefore, it is the purpose of this article to develop a procedure which takes into consideration the need for competition in granting concessions as well as the long-term contributions on the part of, and the benefits that may be received in the future by retaining, existing concessionaires.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1049, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5038.1.

The parties to the joint powers agreement of April 1, 1974, and to subsequent amendments to the agreement regarding the El Pueblo de Los Angeles State Historic Park, being the City of Los Angeles, the County of Los Angeles, and the state through the Department of Parks and Recreation, shall jointly develop a viable procedure and enter into an agreement for the awarding of concessions which would preserve and further the cultural continuity and physical integrity of the Olvera Street portion of the park. In developing the procedure, the parties shall take into consideration the need for competition in granting concessions with the long-term contributions on the part of, and the benefits to be received in the future by retaining, existing concessionaires.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1049, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5038.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or any other provision of law, the length of the term of any concession contract or approval within the El Pueblo de Los Angeles State Historic Park in effect on the effective date of this section shall, at the request of the concessionaire, be extended by the department or its designee until January 1, 1989. Any contract extended pursuant to this subdivision shall be renegotiated, if necessary, to ensure that the rental rates in the contract on January 1, 1988, accurately reflect current commercial rental market rates.

(b) The Director of Parks and Recreation shall prepare a progress report on the status of the negotiations with the City of Los Angeles to arrange for a long-term administration of the El Pueblo de Los Angeles State Historic Park by either the City of Los Angeles or the state, and the administration of a concession operation therein by a master concessionaire, and shall submit the report to the Legislature on or before July 1, 1988.

(c) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or any provision of law except subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 5080.20, if applicable, any concession contract or approval extended or renegotiated pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) may be superseded by the agreement to implement the procedure specified in Section 5038.1, when that agreement is executed and approved by the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1408, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

5038.3.

“Concession,” as used in this article, does not include those premises at El Pueblo de Los Angeles State Historic Park which are primarily rented and used for offices, banking, or storage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1049, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Columbia Historic State Park [5040. - 5043.]

5040.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the State of California to establish and preserve as a historical monument representative of the early gold mining days of this State that portion of the old town of Columbia in Tuolumne County whose acquisition was initiated under the provisions of Chapter 1387 of the Statutes of 1945.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

5041.

To assure the accomplishment of this policy it is directed that:

(a) The department shall make a survey based on historical research to determine the type and materials of construction, location, and uses of the structures which existed on the acquired area of the town of Columbia during those “early days”; and based on the data so obtained shall prepare a master plan of restorational development to which all work of preservation and restoration shall substantially conform. Thereafter such master plan may be modified by the department acting upon additional authentic information. Pending completion of such master plan work of preservation and repair of existing structures which have existed since “early days” and the restoration and erection of such structures the authenticity of whose plans and construction may be satisfactorily determined may be accomplished by the department to the extent of availability of appropriated funds or of other funds donated to the department for such purposes.

(b) Leases of buildings within the area may be made by the department on such terms and conditions as determined by the department for occupancy, including such lawful use which is found to be the same or similar use which held in the “early days” or which as determined by the department is not inconsistent with the objective of this article.

(c) A building or buildings shall be used for the establishment of a museum to shelter and display exhibits of appliances used in mining or other activities of the vicinity, articles formerly possessed or used by “early days” inhabitants of the town, and items of historic interest or suitable for inclusion as approved by the department, whether loaned, donated or otherwise acquired.

(d) Any structures whose preservation or restoration is assured by suitable contribution, when approved by the department, may be named in honor of or as a memorial to the donor or as designated by the donor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2164.)
-------------------------------------------

5042.

The Columbia Historic Park Association, a nonprofit corporation, is designated as a committee advisory to the department in the research incident to and adoption of the master plan for development and upon policies of preservation, restoration and management of Columbia Historic State Park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2164.)
-------------------------------------------

5043.

Columbia Historic State Park is a unit of the State Park System and shall be administered in accordance with the laws applying thereto subject to the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.6. Mono Lake Tufa State Reserve [5045. - 5049.]

5045.

(a) The tufa and associated sand structures at Mono Lake are a valuable geologic and scientific natural resource and are unique in North America for their beauty, abundance, diversity, and public accessibility. Their extreme fragility requires special measures for their protection and preservation for the enjoyment and education of the public.

(b) The Mono Lake Tufa State Reserve is hereby established as a unit of the state park system and shall consist of the state-owned portions of the Mono Lake bed lying at or below the elevation of 6,417 feet above sea level. As soon as practicable after January 1, 1982, the State Lands Commission shall issue a permit for occupancy to the department pursuant to Section 6221.

(c) (1) The reserve shall include, and the department shall manage, all resources within the reserve’s boundaries, including, but not limited to, the waters of Mono Lake.

(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1), nothing in this subdivision grants the department authority over any of the following:

(A) The instream flow requirements of the tributaries to Mono Lake.

(B) The water surface elevation of Mono Lake.

(C) The water production, diversion, storage, and conveyance activities of the City of Los Angeles.

(D) The determination of water quality standards for Mono Lake.

(d) As soon as practicable after January 1, 1982, the State Lands Commission shall issue a permit for occupancy to the department pursuant to Section 6221.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 702, Sec. 10.   Effective September 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5046.

(a) The reserve shall be managed primarily for the purpose of protecting the tufa and associated sand structures and providing for their interpretation. The department shall designate public accessways to Mono Lake for recreational and other purposes that are not in conflict with the preservation of the tufa and associated sand structures.

(b) The department may enter into agreements with any other public agency to provide for the joint management of the reserve and the provision of visitor and interpretive services and facilities in connection therewith. For purposes of administrative support, departmental personnel may be assigned to any other unit of the state park system in the vicinity of the reserve.

(c) The department shall commence managing the reserve, including all resources within the reserve’s boundaries which includes the waters of Mono Lake, as soon as practicable after January 1, 1982, and, to this end, the reserve is exempt from the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 5002.2 because the only improvements contemplated at the reserve are temporary facilities within the meaning of subdivision (c) of Section 5002.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 12.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5047.

(a) No provision of this article shall be construed to interfere with any reasonable use of land or other activity existing or occurring on or before January 1, 1981, within the boundary of the reserve that does not conflict with the purposes for which the reserve is established. Accordingly, any such use of land or other activity is not subject to Section 5001.65.

(b) No provision of this article or Section 5019.65 is intended, nor shall be construed, to interfere in any way with the City of Los Angeles’ diversion of water from streams tributary to Mono Lake pursuant to state water rights licenses numbered 10191 and 10192.

(c) No provision of this article shall be construed to affirm or deny the legal right of the City of Los Angeles to divert water from the Mono Basin.

(d) No provision of this article shall be construed for the purpose of establishing, or interfering with the establishment of, the ownership of relicted lands in the current litigation between California and the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 670, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5048.

Any disturbance, defacement, displacement, or other interference with any tufa or associated sand structure by any person or instrumentality is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months or by both such fine and imprisonment.

This section shall apply to all tufa and associated sand structures within the Mono Lake basin, regardless of their location on public or private lands or within or without the boundaries of the reserve. The department shall provide for the enforcement of, and any other peace officer within the Mono Basin shall enforce, this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 670, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5049.

Natural or artificially caused accretion or reliction of the waters of Mono Lake shall not be deemed contrary to the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 670, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Hostel Facilities [5050. - 5055.]

5050.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Collier-Keene State Hostel Facilities Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 265.)
-------------------------------------------

5051.

The Legislature finds that a substantial number of Californians bicycle and walk for recreational enjoyment and that, given safer routes and more suitable accommodations, would choose such travel means to reach and enjoy scenic areas and recreation facilities throughout the state. The Legislature finds that it is in the public interest to provide means for bicyclists and hikers to reach safely, and utilize conveniently, units of the state park system and local and regional parks and recreation areas. The Legislature specifically finds that the existing mix of motor vehicles and bicycles on the highways of the state creates hazards to motorists and cyclists alike and demands immediate remedial action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1440.)
-------------------------------------------

5052.

As used in this article, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning:

(a) “Hostel facility” means a supervised overnight lodging or sleeping accommodation provided primarily for use by persons, including bicyclists and hikers, arriving at state park system units and local and regional parks and recreation areas. Hostel facilities shall include sleeping areas for individuals or groups, water, washrooms, sanitary facilities, and means by which the users of hostel facilities may prepare their own meals.

(b) “Recreational trail” means a pathway situated and constructed so as to provide safe and convenient means for persons, including bicyclists, hikers, and horsemen, to travel to and between state park system units other than by motor vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1440.)
-------------------------------------------

5053.

(a) The department may provide hostel facilities in any unit of the state park system where consistent with the general development plan for such unit, and may provide for hostel facilities in the general plan for any unit; provided, however, that no hostel facility may be provided in any unit classified as a state wilderness, natural preserve, or state reserve.

(b) The department may also provide hostel facilities at any park or recreation area under the jurisdiction of any local or regional public agency if such agency enters into an agreement with the department for the care, maintenance, and control of such facilities at the agency’s expense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1440.)
-------------------------------------------

5054.

The department may acquire land for, develop, and maintain recreational trails to and between units of the state park system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 265.)
-------------------------------------------

5055.

Except as provided in Section 18930 of the Health and Safety Code, the director shall adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary to administer the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Lease Contracts for Park and Recreational Areas [5060. - 5067.]

5060.

The department may enter into contracts with individuals or with other governmental agencies or departments for the lease, for park and recreational purposes and for the development and expansion of park and recreational areas, of lands which in the judgment of the department are desirable for these purposes, on such terms and subject to such conditions as the department may determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2164.)
-------------------------------------------

5061.

The term of such a lease shall not exceed twenty years nor be less than two years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5062.

Any such lease contract shall contain an option permitting the State to purchase the lands under lease. The lease contract shall include provisions:

(a) That all payments made by the State as rental thereunder shall be applied on the purchase price of the lands.

(b) That at the end of each two-year period, if the State so elects, the lessor will convey to the State, without additional consideration, a designated area of the lands under lease, as described therein, which area shall be such proportion of the total area as the amount of rental paid by the State for such period bears to the total amount of rental to be paid under the lease.

(c) That the State may terminate the rental contract at its option at the end of any two-year period.

(d) That the total rental to be paid under any such lease contract shall not be in excess of the appraised value of the lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5063.

Before entering into any lease contract, the lands proposed to be leased shall be appraised by the department to determine the fair market value of the lands. The total amount of rent to be paid for the entire term under any lease contract shall not be in excess of the fair market value of the lands, as determined by the appraisal. The Department of General Services shall review and approve any appraisal conducted by the department pursuant to this section, unless review and approval is waived by the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 775, Sec. 10.   (SB 630)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5064.

The department for a consideration may assign such options to other governmental agencies or departments. The department may accept gifts of money or lands from individuals and from other governmental agencies for the purpose of acquiring, by purchase or exchange, the lands under option.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2164.)
-------------------------------------------

5065.

Lands leased shall be administered as a part of the California State park system, subject to existing laws affecting the operation and administration of State parks.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5066.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Department of Parks and Recreation shall extend until December 31, 1979 the existing concession agreement, dated May 6, 1948, as amended March 21, 1958, between the State of California and the Girl Scout Council of San Diego County, Incorporated, relating to the “Stonewall Group Organizational Area” and premises in Cuyamaca Rancho State Park, San Diego County, California. Thereafter, there shall be no such agreement in force or effect other than an agreement consummated pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 5019.10) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 387.)
-------------------------------------------

5067.

The department may enter into, for a period not less than 20 years and not to exceed 25 years, an agreement with the Desert Pacific Council of the Boy Scouts of America for the use of a portion of Cuyamaca Rancho State Park. Any agreement so entered into shall be subject to approval by the Director of General Services pursuant to Section 11005.2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 315, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Agricultural Leasing [5069. - 5069.4.]

5069.

The Legislature finds and declares that agricultural lands are necessary to the conservation of the state’s economic resources and necessary to the maintenance of the economy of the state, and that the preservation of agricultural lands in productivity is necessary for the protection of the public interest and, in appropriate instances, is desirable for the enhancement of the use and enjoyment of units of the state park system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 439, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

5069.1.

Any portion of any parcel of real property acquired for state park system purposes, which had been farmed or grazed, or otherwise used for agricultural purposes, within the 24 months immediately preceding acquisition, may be made available for lease for agricultural purposes by the department if the director makes written findings that use of the real property for agricultural purposes would be compatible with the ultimate use of the real property as a unit, or part of a unit, of the state park system and with the sound management and conservation of resources within the unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1087, Sec. 2.1.)
-------------------------------------------

5069.2.

Following approval of the general plan for a unit of the state park system pursuant to Section 5002.2, all real property which has been designated in the general plan for retention in agricultural use indefinitely as a feature of that unit shall be made available for leasing by the department for agricultural purposes. In addition, any real property which will not be improved pursuant to the general plan for at least three years from the date of approval of the general plan, and which was being leased for agricultural purposes immediately prior to approval of the general plan, may continue to be available for leasing for agricultural purposes if the director makes written findings that use would be compatible with the general plan or until the commencement of improvements thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1087, Sec. 2.3.)
-------------------------------------------

5069.3.

(a) The rent for real property leased for agricultural purposes shall be based upon the fair market value of the real property when used for agricultural purposes. All rents shall be deposited pursuant to Section 5010.

(b) A lease term shall not exceed 10 years. A lease may be renewed for additional terms.

(c) A lease entered into pursuant to this article shall be subject to approval by the Department of General Services, unless that approval is waived by the Department of General Services. Each lease shall require the lessee to pay the taxes on the lessee’s interest in the real property that become due, owing, or
 unpaid on the interest created by the lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 775, Sec. 11.   (SB 630)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5069.4.

For the purposes of this article, “agricultural purposes” means the growing and harvesting of plant or animal products in a manner not inconsistent with the long-term natural qualities and recreational potentials of the land. “Agricultural purposes” does not include any activity related to the harvesting and production of timber.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1027, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. California Recreational Trails [5070. - 5077.8.]

5070.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the California Recreational Trails Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1461.)
-------------------------------------------

5070.3.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions shall govern construction of this article:

(a) “Affirmative access area” means an area of already existing disability access improvements along a heritage corridor.

(b) “Heritage corridor” means a regional, state, or nationwide alignment of historical, natural, or conservation education significance, with roads, state and other parks, greenways, or parallel recreational trails, intended to have guidebooks, signs, and other features to enable self-guiding tourism, and environmental conservation education along most of its length and of all or
 some of the facilities open to the public along its length, with an emphasis on facilities whose physical and interpretive accessibility meet “whole-access” goals.

(c) “Heritage corridors access map” means a 1:500,000 publicly distributed map combining listings and locations of parks, trails, museums, and roadside historical and natural access points, including disability and interpretive access data, along designated heritage corridors.

(d) “Plan” means the California Recreational Trails System Plan.

(e) “System” means the California Recreational Trails System.

(f) “Whole-access” means a general level of trail and human accessibility that includes not only
 disabled persons but all others making up the “easy-access” majority of the public. This level of accessibility may also benefit from amplified concepts of natural terrain accessibility and cooperation with volunteer and nonprofit accessibility groups.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 522, Sec. 2.   (AB 1789)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5070.5.

The Legislature hereby declares that it is the policy of the state to:

(a) Increase accessibility and enhance the use, enjoyment, and understanding of California’s scenic, natural, historic, and cultural resources.

(b) Encourage hiking, horseback riding, and bicycling as important contributions to the health and welfare of the state’s population.

(c) Provide for the use of recreational trails by physically disabled persons, the elderly, and others in need of graduated trails with special safety features, particularly in conjunction with heritage corridors.

(d) Increase opportunities for recreational boating on designated waterways. 

(e) Increase opportunities for use of recreational vehicles in designated areas and trail corridors pursuant to Chapter 1.25 (commencing with Section 5090.01).

(f) Provide for the development and maintenance of a statewide system of recreational and interpretive trails, including heritage corridors.

(g) Increase the recreational and educational use of public roads by developing guides, maps, and other interpretive materials concerning significant historical, agricultural, scenic, and other resource areas.

(h) Encourage the development by cities, counties, districts, and private groups of recreational and interpretive trails, including heritage corridors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 994, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

5070.7.

The director shall cause to be prepared a comprehensive plan for the development and operation of a statewide system of recreation trails. The plan, which shall be titled the California Recreational Trails System Plan, shall do all of the following:

(a) Assess the present and future demand for trail-oriented recreation uses.

(b) Recommend an integrated and interconnecting system of trail routes designed to provide a wide range of recreational opportunities and to ensure access and linkage to scenic, natural, historic, and recreational areas of statewide significance.

(c) Recommend priorities for funding to improve and expand nonmotorized natural surface trails, trail networks, greenway corridors, and other nonmotorized infrastructure that promote either new or alternate access to parks, waterways, outdoor recreational pursuits, and forested or other natural environments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 522, Sec. 3.   (AB 1789)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5071.

The plan shall contain, but shall not be limited to, the following elements:

(a) Pedestrian trails.

(b) Bikeways.

(c) Equestrian trails.

(d) Boating trails.

(e) Trails and areas suitable for use by physically disabled persons, the elderly, and others in need of graduated trails, especially along designated heritage corridors.

(f) Cross-country skiing trails.

(g) Heritage corridors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 994, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

5071.3.

For each of the elements specified in Section 5071, the plan shall:

(a) Set forth the role of state government in providing increased opportunities associated with that particular recreational use.

(b) Describe specific policies, standards, and criteria to be followed by the department and other participating public agencies in acquiring, developing, operating, and maintaining land and water trails and areas as part of the system. 

(c) Specify standards and criteria to be followed by the department and other participating public agencies in providing facilities such as overnight camps, hostels, rest areas, access points, corrals, launching ramps, staging areas, and parking areas to complement trail routes and areas.

(d) Identify, on a statewide basis, the general location and extent of trail routes, areas, and complementary facilities to be included within the system.

(e) Describe new and revised state policies, programs, and other actions of the executive and legislative branches required to assure orderly development of the system.

(f) Recommend to federal, regional, and local agencies and to the private sector actions which will assist and complement state efforts to implement the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1461.)
-------------------------------------------

5071.5.

In the preparation of an update to the plan, the director shall actively seek participation of other units of state government and of appropriate federal, regional, and local agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 522, Sec. 4.   (AB 1789)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5071.7.

(a) (1) In planning the system, the director shall consult with and seek the assistance of the Department of Transportation. The Department of Transportation shall plan and design those trail routes that are in need of construction contiguous to state highways and serve both a transportation and a recreational need.

(2) The Department of Transportation shall install or supervise the installation of signs along heritage corridors consistent with the plan element developed pursuant to this section; provided, however, that it shall neither install nor supervise the installation of those signs until it determines that it has available to it adequate volunteers or funds, or a combination thereof, to install or supervise the installation of the
 signs, or until the Legislature appropriates sufficient funds for the installation or supervision of installation, whichever occurs first.

(b) The element of the plan relating to boating trails and other segments of the system which are oriented to waterways shall be prepared and maintained by the Division of Boating and Waterways within the Department of Parks and Recreation pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 68) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of the Harbors and Navigation Code. Those segments shall be integrated with the California Protected Waterways Plan developed pursuant to Chapter 1278 of the Statutes of 1968, and shall be planned so as to be consistent with the preservation of rivers of the California Wild and Scenic Rivers System, as provided in Chapter 1.4 (commencing with Section 5093.50).

(c) Any element of the plan relating to trails and areas for the use of
 off-highway motor vehicles shall be prepared and maintained by the Division of Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Recreation pursuant to Chapter 1.25 (commencing with Section 5090.01).

(d) In planning the system, the director shall consult with and seek the assistance of the Department of Rehabilitation, representatives of its California Access Network volunteers, and nonprofit disability access groups to ensure that adequate provision is made for publicizing the potential use of recreational trails, including heritage corridors by physically disabled persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 254.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5072.

Upon preparation of an update to the plan, the director shall hold at least four public hearings in different geographical regions of the state to solicit views of the public and interested private groups and governmental agencies on the goals, policies, and proposals of the update to the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 522, Sec. 5.   (AB 1789)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5072.7.

Following an update of the plan as provided in Section 5073, all state agencies and departments whose operations are affected by, or related to, the goals, policies, and proposals of the update to the plan shall use the update to the plan as a guide in their operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 522, Sec. 7.   (AB 1789)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5072.8.

(a) The Recreational Trails Fund is hereby created. Moneys in the Recreational Trails Fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the department for competitive grants to cities, counties, districts, state and federal agencies, federally recognized California Native American tribes, nonfederally recognized California Native American tribes included on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission, and nonprofit organizations with management responsibilities over public lands to acquire and develop recreational trails.

(b) The Controller shall promptly transfer all money received by the state
 from the federal government as allocations from the National Recreational Trails Trust Fund pursuant to the Steve Symms National Recreational Trails Fund Act of 1991 (P.L. 102-240) and deposited in the Federal Trust Fund, to the Recreational Trails Fund. The money in the Recreational Trails Fund shall be available to the department for expenditure, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for grants pursuant to subdivision (a), in accordance with the Steve Symms National Recreational Trails Fund Act of 1991. Seventy percent of the money received by the state from the federal government and transferred to the Recreational Trails Fund pursuant to this subdivision shall be available only for nonmotorized recreational trails with at least one-half of that amount available only for grants to cities, counties, districts, federally recognized California Native American tribes, nonfederally recognized
 California Native American tribes included on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission, and nonprofit organizations for the acquisition and development of new nonmotorized recreational trails and the reconstruction or relocation of existing nonmotorized recreational trails.

(c) The department shall prepare and adopt criteria and procedures for evaluating applications for grants, which, at a minimum, shall include certification that the project is consistent with the applicant’s general plan or the equivalent planning document, complies with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) and other environmental protection laws and regulations, and is not required as a mitigation measure as a condition for a permit or other entitlement. The department shall forward to
 the Director of Finance for inclusion in the Governor’s Budget of each fiscal year all projects that are recommended for funding and those projects shall be contained in the Budget Bill for that fiscal year.

(d) A grant shall not be made from the Recreational Trails Fund to an applicant unless the applicant agrees to both of the following conditions:

(1) To maintain and operate the property acquired, developed, rehabilitated, or restored with the funds in perpetuity. With the approval of the department, the applicant or its successors in interest in the property may transfer the responsibility to maintain and operate the property in accordance with this section. In the case of lands not held in fee by the applicant (limited tenure projects), perpetuity shall be in accordance
 with the tenure or for the length of time sufficient to provide public benefits commensurate with the type and duration of interest in land held by the applicant.

(2) To use the property only for the purposes of the grant and to make no other use, sale, or other disposition or conversion of the property except as authorized by a specific act of the Legislature and the property shall be replaced with property of equivalent value and usefulness as determined by the department. The property acquired or developed may be transferred to another public agency if the successor agency assumes the obligations imposed under this chapter.

(e) All applicants for a grant pursuant to this section shall submit an application to the department for approval. Each application shall include
 in writing the conditions specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d).

(f) The department, before dispersing a grant pursuant to this section on or after January 1, 2024, shall have a mechanism in place to recover a grant spent outside the terms of the recipient’s grant agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 831, Sec. 4.   (AB 1150)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5073.

(a) On or before January 1, 2024, the director shall prepare and provide to the Legislature a full update of the plan.

(b) Following the update to the plan pursuant to subdivision (a), the director shall periodically review, revise, and update the plan and provide a copy of the update to the Legislature.

(c) Every three years following an update to the plan pursuant to this section, the director shall submit a report to the Legislature describing progress in carrying out the plan and recommending additional routes or other modifications in the system as the director determines are necessary or
 desirable.

(d) A report or plan submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) Following an update to the plan pursuant to this section, the department shall post the plan on the department’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 522, Sec. 8.   (AB 1789)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5074.1.

The director shall be responsible for planning and for the orderly development and operation of the system. The director shall encourage other public agencies to acquire, develop, and manage segments of the system which are outside of the exterior boundaries of state park system units, and other areas under state jurisdiction. The director may enter into contractual agreements under which responsibility for state trail development and operation may be carried out by other public agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1461.)
-------------------------------------------

5074.3.
